apertium-fr-pt.pt.dix
    <pardef n="abal/ar__vblex">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aríamos</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aria</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aríeis</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arias</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ariam</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aria</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aremos</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arei</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>areis</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arás</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arão</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ará</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>armos</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>armo</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>armos</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantemos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantemos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>á</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ardes</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arde</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ardes</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantemos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ares</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>are</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ares</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantemos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arem</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arem</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantam"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantar"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>á</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ando</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ando</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__canta"/>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>amos</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ámos</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>amo</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>amos</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantemos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ámo</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ámos</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantemos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ei</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ei</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantaste"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>astes</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aste</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>astes</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantemos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aste</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aste</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantaste"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aram</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aram</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantam"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ou</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ou</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__canta"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emos</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emo</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emos</l>

      <e lm="accionar" v="pt">
        <i>accion</i>
        <par n="abal/ar__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="adoptar" v="pt">
        <i>adopt</i>
        <par n="abal/ar__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="ajustar">
        <i>ajust</i>
        <par n="abal/ar__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="apelar">
        <i>apel</i>
        <par n="abal/ar__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="armar">
        <i>arm</i>
        <par n="abal/ar__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="constitucionalizar">
        <i>constitucionaliz</i>
        <par n="abal/ar__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="baptizar" v="pt">
        <i>baptiz</i>
        <par n="abal/ar__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="capturar">
        <i>captur</i>
        <par n="abal/ar__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="comandar">
        <i>comand</i>
        <par n="abal/ar__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="conectar">
        <i>conect</i>
        <par n="abal/ar__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="consultar">
        <i>consult</i>
        <par n="abal/ar__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="costumar">
        <i>costum</i>
        <par n="abal/ar__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="degolar">
        <i>degol</i>
        <par n="abal/ar__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="desarmar">
        <i>desarm</i>
        <par n="abal/ar__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="despertar" r="LR">
        <i>despert</i>
        <par n="abal/ar__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="direcionar" v="br">
        <i>direcion</i>
        <par n="abal/ar__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="emocionar">
        <i>emocion</i>
        <par n="abal/ar__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="entrevistar">
        <i>entrevist</i>
        <par n="abal/ar__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="estimular">
        <i>estimul</i>
        <par n="abal/ar__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="festejar">
        <i>festej</i>
        <par n="abal/ar__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="hospitalizar">
        <i>hospitaliz</i>
        <par n="abal/ar__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="interpretar">
        <i>interpret</i>
        <par n="abal/ar__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="minimizar">
        <i>minimiz</i>
        <par n="abal/ar__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="participar">
        <i>particip</i>
        <par n="abal/ar__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="privilegiar">
        <i>privilegi</i>
        <par n="abal/ar__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="redirecionar" v="br">
        <i>redirecion</i>
        <par n="abal/ar__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="resultar">
        <i>result</i>
        <par n="abal/ar__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="sonhar">
        <i>sonh</i>
        <par n="abal/ar__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="treinar">
        <i>trein</i>
        <par n="abal/ar__vblex"/>
      </e>
     <e lm="encarcerar">
        <i>encarcer</i>
        <par n="abal/ar__vblex"/>
      </e>
		<e lm="clausurar">
			<i>clausur</i>
			<par n="abal/ar__vblex"/>
		</e>
<e lm="sitiar">
	<i>siti</i>
	<par n="abal/ar__vblex"/>
</e>
<e lm="listar">
	<i>list</i>
	<par n="abal/ar__vblex"/>
</e>
<e lm="envergonhar">
	<i>envergonh</i>
	<par n="abal/ar__vblex"/>
</e>
<e lm="ajoelhar">
	<i>ajoelh</i>
	<par n="abal/ar__vblex"/>
</e>
<e lm="consolar">
	<i>consol</i>
	<par n="abal/ar__vblex"/>
</e>
<e lm="entoar">
	<i>ento</i>
	<par n="abal/ar__vblex"/>
</e>
<e lm="isentar">
	<i>isent</i>
	<par n="abal/ar__vblex"/>
</e>
<e lm="remar">
	<i>rem</i>
	<par n="abal/ar__vblex"/>
</e>
  <e lm="dessar" a="imaxin|software">
  	<i>dess</i>
    <par n="abal/ar__vblex"/>
	</e>
    <e lm="fascinar"><i>fascin</i><par n="abal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="recalcular"><i>recalcul</i><par n="abal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="alucinar"><i>alucin</i><par n="abal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="arbitrar"><i>arbitr</i><par n="abal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="desequilibrar"><i>desequilibr</i><par n="abal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fragmentar"><i>fragment</i><par n="abal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="prensar"><i>prens</i><par n="abal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sibilar"><i>sibil</i><par n="abal/ar__vblex"/></e>
